Maryland, session 2025, HB0632.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Labor and Employment
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0632*

HOUSE BILL 632
3–507.2.
(c) (1) In this subsection, “construction services” [has the meaning stated in §
3–901 of this title] INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING SERVICES PROVIDED IN CONNECTION
WITH REAL PROPERTY:
(I) BUILDING;
(II) RECONSTRUCTING;
(III) IMPROVING;
(IV) ENLARGING;
(V) PAINTING;
(VI) ALTERING;
(VII) MAINTAINING; AND
(VIII) REPAIRING.
3–901.
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
[(b) “Construction services” includes the following services provided in connection
with real property:
(1) building;
(2) reconstructing;
(3) improving;
(4) enlarging;
(5) painting;
(6) altering;
(7) maintaining; and
(8) repairing.]

HOUSE BILL 632 3
[(c)] (B) “Employer” means any person that employs an individual in the State.
[(d)] (C) “Exempt person” means an individual who:
(1) performs services in a personal capacity and employs no individuals
other than:
(i) a spouse of the exempt person;
(ii) children of the exempt person; or
(iii) parents of the exempt person;
(2) performs services free from direction and control over the means and
manner of providing the services, subject only to the right of the person or entity for whom
services are provided to specify the desired result;
(3) furnishes the tools and equipment necessary to provide the service;
(4) operates a business that is considered inseparable from the individual
for purposes of taxes, profits, and liabilities:
(i) in which the individual:
1. owns all of the assets and profits of the business; and
2. has sole, unlimited, personal liability for all of the debts
and liabilities of the business, unless the business is organized as a single–owned corporate
entity, to which sole, unlimited personal liability does not apply; and
(ii) for which:
1. the individual does not pay taxes for the business
separately but reports business income and losses on the individual’s personal tax return;
and
2. if the business is organized as a corporate entity and the
individual otherwise qualifies as an exempt person under this subsection, the individual
files a separate federal informational tax return for the entity as required by law;
(5) exercises complete control over the management and operations of the
business; and
(6) exercises the right and opportunity on a continuing basis to perform the
services of the business for multiple entities at the individual’s sole choice and discretion.

HOUSE BILL 632
[(e)] (D) “Knowingly” means having actual knowledge, deliberate ignorance, or
reckless disregard for the truth.
[(f) “Landscaping services” includes the following services:
(1) garden maintenance and planting;
(2) lawn care including fertilizing, mowing, mulching, seeding, and
spraying;
(3) seeding and mowing of highway strips;
(4) sod laying;
(5) turf installation, except artificial;
(6) ornamental bush planting, pruning, bracing, spraying, and removal;
and
(7) ornamental tree planting, pruning, bracing, spraying, and removal.]
[(g)] (E) (1) “Place of business” means the office or headquarters of the
employer.
(2) “Place of business” does not include a work site at which the employer
has been contracted to perform services.
[(h)] (F) “Public body” means:
(1) the State;
(2) a unit of State government or an instrumentality of the State; or
(3) any political subdivision, agency, person, or entity that is a party to a
contract for which 50% or more of the money used is State money.
[3–902.
This subtitle applies only to the following industries:
(1) construction services; and
(2) landscaping services.]
3–1601.

HOUSE BILL 632 5
(a) In this subtitle the following words have the meanings indicated.
(d) (1) “Employer” includes a person who acts directly or indirectly in the
interest of another employer with an employee.
(2) “Employer” does not include:
(i) an employer that provides construction services, as defined in [§
3–901] § 3–507.2 of this title; or
(ii) an airline.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.